District of Columbia statutes.
7-151

Establishment of the Department of Public Health.

There is established in the Executive Branch of the Government of the District of Columbia a Department of Public Health, which shall have as its responsibility the planning, development and implementation of the delivery of health care services to all District of Columbia residents.

Mar. 13, 1992, D.C. Law 9-182, § 2, 39 DCR 8203

History

1981 Ed., § 6-131.

Prior Codifications

Pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1996 each of the functions assigned, and authorities delegated to the Director of the Department of Human Services as set forth in Sections III. (K), (L), and (P), of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, dated January 3, 1987.

The administrative and management support functions in the Department of Human Services as set forth in Sections III. (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), and (F), of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, dated January 3, 1987, that relate to the functions set forth in section V. (A)(1) above were transferred to the Department of Health.

Transfer of Functions

Establishment and Appointments — Mayor’s Bioterrorism Preparedness and Response Program Advisory Committee, see Mayor’s Order 2002-77, May 3, 2002 ( 49 DCR 4137).

Establishment and Appointments — Mayor’s Hospital Bioterrorism Preparedness Planning Advisory Committee, see Mayor’s Order 2002-78, May 3, 2002 ( 49 DCR 4143).

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 2002-77, dated 4-5-02, Establishment and Appointments — Mayor’s Bioterrorism Preparedness and Response Program Advisory Committee, see Mayor’s Order 2002-145, August 30, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8411).

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 2002-78, dated 4-15-02, Establishment and Appointments — Mayor’s Hospital Bioterrorism Preparedness, see Mayor’s Order 2002-147, August 30, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8415).

Mayor's Orders